Illinois, session 104th, SB3322.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Section 201 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/201)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1201)7    Sec. 201. (a) The Department shall carry out the 8provisions of this Article. The Department or its successor 9agency may, by administrative rule, add additional substances 10to or delete or reschedule all controlled substances in the 11Schedules of Sections 204, 206, 208, 210 and 212 of this Act. 12In making a determination regarding the addition, deletion, or 13rescheduling of a substance, the Department shall consider the 14following:15        (1) the actual or relative potential for misuse;16        (2) the scientific evidence of its pharmacological 17    effect, if known;18        (3) the state of current scientific knowledge 19    regarding the substance;20        (4) the history and current pattern of misuse;21        (5) the scope, duration, and significance of misuse;22        (6) the risk to the public health;23        (7) the potential of the substance to produce   SB3322 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17631 BAB 31062 b1    psychological or physiological dependence or a substance 2    use disorder;3        (8) whether the substance is an immediate precursor of 4    a substance already controlled under this Article;5        (9) the immediate harmful effect in terms of 6    potentially fatal dosage; and7        (10) the long-range effects in terms of permanent 8    health impairment.9    (b) (Blank). 10    (c) (Blank). 11    (d) If any substance is scheduled, rescheduled, or deleted 12as a controlled substance under Federal law and notice thereof 13is given to the Department, the Department shall similarly 14control the substance under this Act after the expiration of 1530 days from publication in the Federal Register of a final 16order scheduling a substance as a controlled substance or 17rescheduling or deleting a substance. If the Department does 18not take action within 30 days, at the conclusion of the 30-day 19period the substance shall be considered scheduled, 20rescheduled, or deleted in the same manner as the federal law, 21unless within that 30-day 30 day period the Department 22objects, or a party adversely affected files with the 23Department substantial written objections objecting to 24inclusion, rescheduling, or deletion. In that case, the 25Department shall publish the reasons for objection or the 26substantial written objections and afford all interested   SB3322 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17631 BAB 31062 b1parties an opportunity to be heard in a public hearing to be 2held no later than 45 days after the statement of objection. 3After At the public conclusion of the hearing, the Department 4shall publish its decision within 14 days of the conclusion of 5the public hearing, by means of a rule, which shall be final 6unless altered by statute. Upon publication of objections by 7the Department, similar control under this Act whether by 8inclusion, rescheduling or deletion is stayed until the 9Department publishes its ruling.10    (e) (Blank).11    (f) (Blank).12    (g) Authority to control under this Section does not 13extend to distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco 14as those terms are defined or used in the Liquor Control Act of 151934 and the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995.16    (h) Persons registered with the Drug Enforcement 17Administration to manufacture or distribute controlled 18substances shall maintain adequate security and provide 19effective controls and procedures to guard against theft and 20diversion, but shall not otherwise be required to meet the 21physical security control requirements (such as cage or vault) 22for Schedule V controlled substances containing 23pseudoephedrine or Schedule II controlled substances 24containing dextromethorphan. 25(Source: P.A. 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB3322 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17631 BAB 31062 b1becoming law.